Utah statutes.
76-6-516.   Conveyance of real estate by married man without wife's consent.

Any married man who falsely represents himself as unmarried and under such representation knowingly conveys or mortgages real estate situate in this state, without the assent or concurrence of his wife when such consent or concurrence is necessary to relinquish her inchoate statutory interest therein, is guilty of a felony of the third degree.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1973 General Session

